Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB212.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "serious provocation" in section 2301 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2301. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this article which are applicable to specific chapters or other provisions of this article, the following words and phrases, when used in this article shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Serious provocation." Conduct sufficient to excite an 123456789101112131415161718 intense passion in a reasonable person. The term does not include the discovery, knowledge or potential disclosure of a victim's actual or perceived gender identity or expression or sexual orientation, including circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted nonforcible romantic or sexual advance toward the defendant or if the defendant and victim had a romantic or sexual relationship.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0212PN0461 - 2 - 12345678